Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2671.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-201, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-201. Definitions In this title, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Abandoned" means the failure of the parent to provide reasonable support and to maintain regular contact with the child, including providing normal supervision. Abandoned includes a judicial finding that a parent has made only minimal efforts to support and communicate with the child. Failure to maintain a normal parental relationship with the child without just cause for a period of six months constitutes prima facie evidence of abandonment. 2. "Abuse": (a) Means the infliction or allowing of physical injury, impairment of bodily function or disfigurement or the infliction of or allowing another person to cause serious emotional damage as evidenced by severe anxiety, depression, withdrawal or untoward aggressive behavior and which emotional damage is diagnosed by a medical doctor or psychologist and is caused by the acts or omissions of an individual who has the care, custody and control of a child, including an employee of a child welfare agency where a child is placed that is licensed by and contracted with the department. (b) Includes: (i) Inflicting or allowing sexual abuse pursuant to section 13-1404, sexual conduct with a minor pursuant to section 13-1405, sexual assault pursuant to section 13-1406, molestation of a child pursuant to section 13-1410, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3552, sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3553, incest pursuant to section 13-3608 or child sex trafficking pursuant to section 13-3212. (ii) Physical injury that results from allowing a child to enter or remain in any structure or vehicle in which volatile, toxic or flammable chemicals are found or equipment is possessed by any person for the purpose of manufacturing a dangerous drug as defined in section 13-3401. (iii) Unreasonable confinement of a child. 3. "Adult" means a person who is eighteen years of age or older. 4. "Adult court" means the appropriate justice court, municipal court or criminal division of the superior court that has jurisdiction to hear proceedings concerning offenses committed by juveniles as provided in sections 8-327 and section 13-501. 5. "Award" or "commit" means to assign legal custody. 6. "Child", "youth" or "juvenile" means an individual who is under eighteen years of age. 7. "Complaint" means a written statement of the essential facts constituting a public offense that is any of the following: (a) Made on an oath before a judge or commissioner of the superior court or an authorized juvenile hearing officer. (b) Made pursuant to section 13-3903. (c) Accompanied by an affidavit of a law enforcement officer or employee that swears on information and belief to the accuracy of the complaint pursuant to section 13-4261. 8. "Criminal conduct allegation" means an allegation of conduct by a parent, guardian or custodian of a child or an adult member of the victim's household that, if true, would constitute any of the following: (a) A violation of section 13-3623 involving child abuse. (b) A felony offense that constitutes domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601. (c) A violation of section 13-1404 or 13-1406 involving a minor. (d) A violation of section 13-1405, 13-1410 or 13-1417. (e) Any other act of abuse that is classified as a felony. (f) An offense that constitutes domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601 and that involves a minor who is a victim of or was in imminent danger during the domestic violence. 9. "Custodian" means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, who stands in loco parentis to the child or a person to whom legal custody of the child has been given by order of the juvenile court. 10. "DCS report" means a communication received by the centralized intake hotline that alleges child abuse or neglect and that meets the criteria for a report as prescribed in section 8-455. 11. "Delinquency hearing" means a proceeding in the juvenile court to determine whether a juvenile has committed a specific delinquent act as set forth in a petition. 12. "Delinquent act" means an act by a juvenile that if committed by an adult would be a criminal offense or a petty offense, a violation of any law of this state, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or a law of the United States, or a violation of any law that can only be violated by a minor and that has been designated as a delinquent offense, or any ordinance of a city, county or political subdivision of this state defining crime. Delinquent act does not include an offense under section 13-501, subsection A or B if the offense that is filed in adult court pursuant to section 13-501, subsection A or B. Any juvenile who is prosecuted as an adult or who is remanded for prosecution as an adult shall not be adjudicated as a delinquent juvenile for the same offense. 13. "Delinquent juvenile" means a child who is adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act. 14. "Department" means the department of child safety. 15. "Dependent child": (a) Means a child who is adjudicated to be: (i) In need of proper and effective parental care and control and who has no parent or guardian, or one who has no parent or guardian willing to exercise or capable of exercising such care and control. (ii) Destitute or who is not provided with the necessities of life, including adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care. (iii) A child whose home is unfit by reason of abuse, neglect, cruelty or depravity by a parent, a guardian or any other person having custody or care of the child. (iv) Under eight years of age and who is found to have committed an act that would result in adjudication as a delinquent juvenile or incorrigible child if committed by an older juvenile or child. (v) Incompetent or not restorable to competency and who is alleged to have committed a serious offense as defined in section 13-706. (b) Does not include a child who in good faith is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited practitioner if none of the circumstances described in subdivision (a) of this paragraph exists. 16. "Detention" means the temporary confinement of a juvenile who requires secure care in a physically restricting facility that is completely surrounded by a locked and physically secure barrier with restricted ingress and egress for the protection of the juvenile or the community pending court disposition or as a condition of probation. 17. "Director" means the director of the department. 18. "Health professional" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-3201. 19. "Incorrigible child" means a child who: (a) Is adjudicated as a child who refuses to obey the reasonable and proper orders or directions of a parent, guardian or custodian and who is beyond the control of that person. (b) Is habitually truant from school as defined in section 15-803, subsection C. (c) Is a runaway from the child's home or parent, guardian or custodian. (d) Habitually behaves in such a manner as to injure or endanger the morals or health of self or others. (e) Commits any act constituting an offense that can only be committed by a minor and that is not designated as a delinquent act. (f) Fails to obey any lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction given in a noncriminal action. 20. "Independent living program" includes a residential program with supervision of less than twenty-four hours a day. 21. "Juvenile court" means the juvenile division of the superior court when exercising its jurisdiction over children in any proceeding relating to delinquency, dependency or incorrigibility. 22. "Law enforcement officer" means a peace officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, municipal police officer or constable. 23. "Medical director of a mental health agency": (a) Means a psychiatrist, or licensed physician experienced in psychiatric matters, who is designated in writing by the governing body of the agency as the person in charge of the medical services of the agency, or a psychiatrist designated by the governing body to act for the director. (b) Includes the superintendent of the state hospital. 24. "Mental health agency" means any private or public facility that is licensed by this state as a mental health treatment agency, a psychiatric hospital, a psychiatric unit of a general hospital or a residential treatment center for emotionally disturbed children and that uses secure settings or mechanical restraints. 25. "Neglect" or "neglected" means: (a) The inability or unwillingness of a parent, guardian or custodian of a child to provide that child with supervision, food, clothing, shelter or medical care if that inability or unwillingness causes substantial risk of harm to the child's health or welfare, except if the inability of a parent, guardian or custodian to provide services to meet the needs of a child with a disability or chronic illness is solely the result of the unavailability of reasonable services. (b) Allowing a child to enter or remain in any structure or vehicle in which volatile, toxic or flammable chemicals are found or equipment is possessed by any person with the intent and for the purpose of manufacturing a dangerous drug as defined in section 13-3401. (c) A determination by a health professional that a newborn infant was exposed prenatally to a drug or substance listed in section 13-3401 and that this exposure was not the result of a medical treatment administered to the mother or the newborn infant by a health professional. This subdivision does not expand a health professional's duty to report neglect based on prenatal exposure to a drug or substance listed in section 13-3401 beyond the requirements prescribed pursuant to section 13-3620, subsection E. The determination by the health professional shall be based on one or more of the following: (i) Clinical indicators in the prenatal period including maternal and newborn presentation. (ii) History of substance use or abuse. (iii) Medical history. (iv) Results of a toxicology or other laboratory test on the mother or the newborn infant. (d) Diagnosis by a health professional of an infant under one year of age with clinical findings consistent with fetal alcohol syndrome or fetal alcohol effects. (e) Deliberate exposure of a child by a parent, guardian or custodian to sexual conduct as defined in section 13-3551 or to sexual contact, oral sexual contact or sexual intercourse as defined in section 13-1401, bestiality as prescribed in section 13-1411 or explicit sexual materials as defined in section 13-3507. (f) Any of the following acts committed by the child's parent, guardian or custodian with reckless disregard as to whether the child is physically present: (i) Sexual contact as defined in section 13-1401. (ii) Oral sexual contact as defined in section 13-1401. (iii) Sexual intercourse as defined in section 13-1401. (iv) Bestiality as prescribed in section 13-1411. 26. "Newborn infant" means a child who is under thirty days of age. 27. "Petition" means a written statement of the essential facts that allege delinquency, incorrigibility or dependency. 28. "Prevention" means the creation of conditions, opportunities and experiences that encourage and develop healthy, self-sufficient children and that occur before the onset of problems. 29. "Protective supervision" means supervision that is ordered by the juvenile court of children who are found to be dependent or incorrigible. 30. "Qualified young adult" means a former dependent child who is at least eighteen years of age and not over twenty-one years of age, who meets the criteria for an extended foster care program pursuant to section 8-521.02 and who signs a voluntary agreement to participate in the program. 31. "Referral" means a report that is submitted to the juvenile court and that alleges that a child is dependent or incorrigible or that a juvenile has committed a delinquent or criminal act. 32. "Secure care" means confinement in a facility that is completely surrounded by a locked and physically secure barrier with restricted ingress and egress. 33. "Serious emotional injury" means an injury that is diagnosed by a medical doctor or a psychologist and that does any one or a combination of the following: (a) Seriously impairs mental faculties. (b) Causes serious anxiety, depression, withdrawal or social dysfunction behavior to the extent that the child suffers dysfunction that requires treatment. (c) Is the result of sexual abuse pursuant to section 13-1404, sexual conduct with a minor pursuant to section 13-1405, sexual assault pursuant to section 13-1406, molestation of a child pursuant to section 13-1410, child sex trafficking pursuant to section 13-3212, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3552, sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3553 or incest pursuant to section 13-3608. 34. "Serious physical injury" means an injury that is diagnosed by a medical doctor and that does any one or a combination of the following: (a) Creates a reasonable risk of death. (b) Causes serious or permanent disfigurement. (c) Causes significant physical pain. (d) Causes serious impairment of health. (e) Causes the loss or protracted impairment of an organ or limb. (f) Is the result of sexual abuse pursuant to section 13-1404, sexual conduct with a minor pursuant to section 13-1405, sexual assault pursuant to section 13-1406, molestation of a child pursuant to section 13-1410, child sex trafficking pursuant to section 13-3212, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3552, sexual exploitation of a minor pursuant to section 13-3553 or incest pursuant to section 13-3608. 35. "Shelter care" means the temporary care of a child in any public or private facility or home that is licensed by this state and that offers a physically nonsecure environment that is characterized by the absence of physically restricting construction or hardware and that provides the child access to the surrounding community. 36. "Standardized hotline assessment tool" means any written tool used to make a determination that the allegation of abuse or neglect that is the subject of a report received pursuant to section 8-455 involves conduct that warrants investigation by the department pursuant to section 8-456 or 8-471. 37. "Young adult administrative review" means an administrative review of a voluntary extended foster care case plan with the qualified young adult, the department's case specialist or designee, an independent party who is not responsible for the case management of or the delivery of services to the qualified young adult and any other individual the young adult invites.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 8-202, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-202. Jurisdiction of juvenile court A. The juvenile court has original jurisdiction over all delinquency proceedings brought under the authority of this title. B. The juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction over all proceedings brought under the authority of this title except for delinquency proceedings. C. The juvenile court may consolidate any matter, except that the juvenile court shall not consolidate any of the following: 1. A criminal proceeding that is filed in another division of superior court and that involves a child who is subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court. 2. A delinquency proceeding with any other proceeding that does not involve delinquency, unless the juvenile delinquency adjudication proceeding is not heard at the same time or in the same hearing as a nondelinquency proceeding. D. The juvenile court has jurisdiction of proceedings to: 1. Obtain judicial consent to the marriage, employment or enlistment in the armed services of a child, if consent is required by law. 2. In an action in which parental rights are terminated pursuant to chapter 4, article 5 or 11 of this title, change the name of a minor child who is the subject of the action. If the minor child who is the subject of the action is twelve years of age or older, the court shall consider the wishes of the child with respect to the name change. E. The juvenile court has jurisdiction over civil traffic violations, civil marijuana violations and offenses listed in section 8-323, subsection B that are committed within the county by persons who are under eighteen years of age unless the presiding judge of the county declines jurisdiction of these cases. The presiding judge of the county may decline jurisdiction of civil traffic violations and civil marijuana violations committed within the county by juveniles if the presiding judge finds that the declination would promote the more efficient use of limited judicial and law enforcement resources located within the county. If the presiding judge declines jurisdiction, juvenile civil traffic violations and civil marijuana violations shall be processed, heard and disposed of in the same manner and with the same penalties as adult civil traffic violations. F. The orders of the juvenile court under the authority of this chapter or chapter 3 or 4 of this title take precedence over any order of any other court of this state except for the following: 1. An order entered in the criminal court concerning an ongoing case that governs a criminal defendant's ability to contact the victim, the family of the victim or other minor children if the criminal court makes a finding that contact with other minor children would pose a risk of harm to those children. 2. An order Orders by the court of appeals and the supreme court to the extent they are inconsistent with orders of other courts. G. Except as provided in subsection H of this section, jurisdiction of a child that is obtained by the juvenile court in a proceeding under this chapter or chapter 3 or 4 of this title shall be retained by it, for the purposes of implementing the orders made and filed in that proceeding, until the child becomes eighteen years of age, unless terminated by order of the court before the child's eighteenth birthday. H. At any time before an adjudication hearing or a proceeding in which a juvenile is admitting to an allegation in a petition that alleges the juvenile is delinquent, the state may file a notice of intent to retain jurisdiction over a juvenile who is seventeen years of age. If the state files a notice of intent to retain jurisdiction, the juvenile court's jurisdiction over a juvenile is retained on the filing of the notice and the court shall retain jurisdiction over the juvenile until the juvenile reaches nineteen years of age, unless before the juvenile's nineteenth birthday either: 1. Jurisdiction is terminated by order of the court. 2. The juvenile is discharged from the jurisdiction of the department of juvenile corrections pursuant to section 41-2820. I. Persons who are under eighteen years of age shall be prosecuted in the same manner as adults if either: 1. The juvenile court transfers jurisdiction pursuant to section 8-327 13-501. 2. The juvenile is charged as an adult with an offense listed in section 13-501. J. The juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction after a juvenile's eighteenth birthday for the purpose of: 1. Designating an undesignated felony offense as a misdemeanor or felony, including after an adjudication is set aside pursuant to section 8-348. 2. Modifying an outstanding monetary obligation imposed by the court except for victim restitution. 3. Implementing section 36-2862. K. The juvenile court has jurisdiction to make the initial determination prescribed in section 8-829 whether the voluntary participation of a qualified young adult in an extended foster care program pursuant to section 8-521.02 is in the young adult's best interests.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 8-305, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-305. Detention center; jail; separate custody; definition A. The county board of supervisors or the county jail district, if authorized pursuant to title 48, chapter 25, shall maintain a detention center that is separate and apart from a jail or lockup in which adults are confined and where juveniles who are alleged to be delinquent or children who are incorrigible and within the provisions of this article shall be detained when necessary before or after a hearing or as a condition of probation. A juvenile who is charged with an offense that is listed in section 13-501 may be detained in a juvenile detention center if the court orders the detention. The board may enter agreements with public or private entities to acquire land for, build, purchase, lease-purchase, lease or expand a detention center required by this section. B. The board of supervisors or the county jail district, if authorized pursuant to title 48, chapter 25, may provide for the detention of juveniles who are accused or convicted of a criminal offense in a jail or lockup in which adults are confined. A juvenile who is confined in a jail or lockup in which adults are confined shall be kept in a physically separate section from any adult who is charged with or convicted of a criminal offense, and no sight or sound contact between the juvenile and any charged or convicted adult is allowed, except to the extent authorized under federal laws or regulations. C. A juvenile, pending a juvenile hearing, shall not be confined with adults charged with or convicted of a crime, except that: 1. A juvenile who is accused of a criminal offense or who is alleged to be delinquent may be securely detained in such location for up to six hours until transportation to a juvenile detention center can be arranged if the juvenile is kept in a physically separate section from any adult who is charged with or convicted of a crime and no sight or sound contact between the juvenile and any charged or convicted adult is allowed, except to the extent authorized under federal laws or regulations. 2. A juvenile who is transferred as provided in section 8-327 13-501 to the criminal division of the superior court may be securely detained if the juvenile is kept in a physically separate section from any adult charged with or convicted of a crime, and no sight or sound contact with any charged or convicted adult is allowed, except to the extent authorized under federal laws or regulations. 3. A juvenile who is arrested for an offense listed in section 13-501 may be detained in a juvenile detention center until formally charged as an adult if the court orders the detention. After a juvenile has been formally charged as an adult the juvenile may be either of the following: (a) Detained in a juvenile detention center. (b) Securely detained in an adult facility if the juvenile is detained separately from any adult charged with or convicted of a crime, except to the extent authorized under federal laws or regulations. D. In determining whether to order that a juvenile who is charged with an offense that is listed in section 13-501 be detained in a juvenile detention center or an adult facility pursuant to subsection A or subsection C, paragraph 3, subdivision (a) of this section, the court shall consider all of the following: 1. The best interests of both the juvenile charged as an adult and the other juveniles detained in the juvenile detention center. 2. The juvenile's age. 3. The juvenile's physical and mental maturity. 4. The juvenile's present mental state, including whether the juvenile presents an imminent risk of harm to the juvenile. 5. The nature and circumstances of the alleged offense. 6. The juvenile's history of prior delinquent acts. 7. The relative ability of the available adult and juvenile detention facilities to meet the specific needs of the juvenile and to protect the safety of the public as well as other detained juveniles. 8. The existing programs and facilities for juveniles at both the juvenile detention center and the adult facility. 9. Any other factor relevant to the determination of where to detain the juvenile. E. The director of juvenile court services in the county in which the juvenile is detained may file a motion in the juvenile's criminal case that requests a juvenile who is charged with an offense listed in section 13-501 be transferred to an adult facility based on the juvenile's conduct while in detention. On the director's request for the juvenile's transfer, the court shall hold a hearing to consider the transfer. At the hearing, the court shall consider all of the factors listed in subsection D of this section. F. A child who is alleged to be delinquent or who is alleged to be incorrigible shall not be securely detained in a jail or lockup in which adults charged with or convicted of a crime are detained. A child may be nonsecurely detained if necessary to obtain the child's name, age, residence or other identifying information for up to six hours until arrangements for transportation to any shelter care facility, home or other appropriate place can be made. A child who is nonsecurely detained shall be detained separately from any adult charged with or convicted of a crime, and no sight or sound contact with any charged or convicted adult is permitted allowed, except to the extent authorized under federal laws or regulations. G. Any detained juvenile or child who, by the juvenile's or child's conduct, endangers or evidences that the juvenile or child may endanger the safety of other detained children shall not be allowed to intermingle with any other juvenile or child in the detention center. H. Pursuant to section 8-322, the county board of supervisors, the county jail district board of directors or the administrative office of the courts on behalf of the juvenile court may enter into an agreement with public or private entities to provide the detention centers required by subsection A of this section. I. For the purposes of this section, "juvenile" includes a person who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to section 8-202, subsection H.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Repeal Section 8-327, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 5. Section 8-341, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-341. Disposition and commitment; definitions A. After receiving and considering the evidence on the proper disposition of the case, the court may enter judgment as follows: 1. It may award a delinquent juvenile: (a) To the care of the juvenile's parents, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (b) To a probation department, subject to any conditions the court may impose, including a period of incarceration in a juvenile detention center of not more than one year. (c) To a reputable citizen of good moral character, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (d) To a private agency or institution, subject to the supervision of a probation officer. (e) To the department of juvenile corrections. (f) To maternal or paternal relatives, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (g) To an appropriate official of a foreign country of which the juvenile is a foreign national who is unaccompanied by a parent or guardian in this state to remain on unsupervised probation for at least one year on the condition that the juvenile cooperate with that official. 2. It may award an incorrigible child: (a) To the care of the child's parents, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (b) To the protective supervision of a probation department, subject to any conditions the court may impose. (c) To a reputable citizen of good moral character, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (d) To a public or private agency, subject to the supervision of a probation department. (e) To maternal or paternal relatives, subject to the supervision of a probation department. B. If a juvenile is placed on probation pursuant to this section, the period of probation may continue until the juvenile's eighteenth birthday or until the juvenile's nineteenth birthday if jurisdiction is retained pursuant to section 8-202, subsection H, except that the term of probation shall not exceed one year if all of the following apply: 1. The juvenile is not charged with a subsequent offense. 2. The juvenile has not been found in violation of a condition of probation. 3. The court has not made a determination that it is in the best interests of the juvenile or the public to require continued supervision. The court may not use the juvenile's failure to pay fees, costs or fines as a reason to continue supervision. The court shall state by minute entry or written order its reasons for finding that continued supervision is required. 4. The offense for which the juvenile is placed on probation does not involve a dangerous offense as defined in section 13-105. 5. The offense for which the juvenile is placed on probation does not involve a violation of title 13, chapter 14 or 35.1. 6. Restitution ordered pursuant to section 8-344 has been made. C. If a juvenile is adjudicated as a first time felony juvenile offender, the court shall provide the following written notice to the juvenile: This is your first felony offense. If you commit another felony offense and you are fourteen years of age or older, any of the following could happen to you: 1. You could be tried as an adult in adult criminal court. 2. You could be committed to the department of juvenile corrections. 3. You could be placed on juvenile intensive probation, which could include incarceration in a juvenile detention center. D. If a juvenile is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated as a repeat felony juvenile offender, unless the court determines based on the severity of the offense and a risk assessment that juvenile intensive probation services are not required, the juvenile court shall place the juvenile on juvenile intensive probation, which may include incarceration in a juvenile detention center, or may commit the juvenile to the department of juvenile corrections pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1, subdivision (e) of this section. E. If the juvenile is adjudicated as a repeat felony juvenile offender, the court shall provide the following written notice to the juvenile: You are now a repeat felony offender. This means: 1. You will be tried as an adult in adult criminal court if you commit another felony offense and you are fifteen years of age or older. 2. You could be tried as an adult in adult criminal court if you commit another felony offense when you are at least fourteen years of age. 3. You could be incarcerated in the state department of corrections if you are convicted as an adult in adult criminal court. F. The failure or inability of the court to provide the notices required under subsections C and E of this section does not preclude the use of the prior adjudications for any purpose otherwise allowed. G. After considering the length of stay guidelines developed pursuant to section 41-2816, subsection C, the court may set forth in the order of commitment the minimum period during which the juvenile shall remain in secure care while in the custody of the department of juvenile corrections. When the court awards a juvenile to the department of juvenile corrections or an institution or agency, it shall transmit with the order of commitment copies of a diagnostic psychological evaluation and educational assessment if one has been administered, copies of the case report, all other psychological and medical reports, restitution orders, any request for postadjudication notice that has been submitted by a victim and any other documents or records pertaining to the case requested by the department of juvenile corrections or an institution or agency. The department shall not release a juvenile from secure care before the juvenile completes the length of stay determined by the court in the commitment order unless the county attorney in the county from which the juvenile was committed requests the committing court to reduce the length of stay. The department may temporarily escort the juvenile from secure care pursuant to section 41-2804, may release the juvenile from secure care without a further court order after the juvenile completes the length of stay determined by the court or may retain the juvenile in secure care for any period subsequent to the completion of the length of stay in accordance with the law. H. Written notice of the release of any juvenile pursuant to subsection G of this section shall be made to any victim requesting notice, the juvenile court that committed the juvenile and the county attorney of the county from which the juvenile was committed. I. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a person is under the supervision of the court as an adjudicated delinquent juvenile at the time the person reaches eighteen years of age, treatment services may be provided until the person reaches twenty-one years of age if the court, the person and the state agree to the provision of the treatment and a motion to transfer the person pursuant to section 8-327 13-501 has not been filed or has been withdrawn. The court may terminate the provision of treatment services after the person reaches eighteen years of age if the court determines that any of the following applies: 1. The person is not progressing toward treatment goals. 2. The person terminates treatment. 3. The person commits a new offense after reaching eighteen years of age. 4. Continued treatment is not required or is not in the best interests of the state or the person. J. On the request of a victim of an act that may have involved significant exposure as defined in section 13-1415 or that if committed by an adult would be a sexual offense, the prosecuting attorney shall petition the adjudicating court to require that the juvenile be tested for the presence of the human immunodeficiency virus. If the victim is a minor the prosecuting attorney shall file this petition at the request of the victim's parent or guardian. If the act committed against a victim is an act that if committed by an adult would be a sexual offense or the court determines that sufficient evidence exists to indicate that significant exposure occurred, it shall order the department of juvenile corrections or the department of health services to test the juvenile pursuant to section 13-1415. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the department of juvenile corrections and the department of health services shall release the test results only to the victim, the delinquent juvenile, the delinquent juvenile's parent or guardian and a minor victim's parent or guardian and shall counsel them regarding the meaning and health implications of the results. K. If a juvenile has been adjudicated delinquent for an offense that if committed by an adult would be an offense listed in section 41-1750, subsection C, the court shall provide the department of public safety Arizona automated fingerprint identification system established in section 41-2411 with the juvenile's ten-print fingerprints, personal identification data and other pertinent information. If a juvenile has been committed to the department of juvenile corrections the department shall provide the fingerprints and information required by this subsection to the Arizona automated fingerprint identification system. If the juvenile's fingerprints and information have been previously submitted to the Arizona automated fingerprint identification system, the information is not required to be resubmitted. L. Access to fingerprint records submitted pursuant to subsection K of this section shall be limited to the administration of criminal justice as defined in section 41-1750. Dissemination of fingerprint information shall be limited to the name of the juvenile, juvenile case number, date of adjudication and court of adjudication. M. If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for an offense that if committed by an adult would be a misdemeanor, the court may prohibit the juvenile from carrying or possessing a firearm while the juvenile is under the jurisdiction of the department of juvenile corrections or the juvenile court. N. If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for a violation of section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 5, the court shall order the juvenile to pay a fine of at least $300 but not more than $1,000. Any restitution ordered shall be paid in accordance with section 13-809, subsection A. The court may order the juvenile to perform community restitution in lieu of the payment for all or part of the fine if it is in the best interests of the juvenile. The court shall credit community restitution performed at a rate that is equal to the minimum wage prescribed by section 23-363, subsections A and B, rounded up to the nearest dollar. If the juvenile is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of section 13-1602, subsection A, paragraph 5 and is ordered to perform community restitution, the court may order the parent or guardian of the juvenile to assist the juvenile in the performance of the community restitution if both of the following apply: 1. The parent or guardian had knowledge that the juvenile intended to engage in or was engaging in the conduct that gave rise to the violation. 2. The parent or guardian knowingly provided the juvenile with the means to engage in the conduct that gave rise to the violation. O. If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for an offense involving the purchase, possession or consumption of spirituous liquor or a violation of title 13, chapter 34 and is placed on juvenile probation, the court may order the juvenile to submit to random drug and alcohol testing at least two times per week as a condition of probation. P. If jurisdiction of the juvenile court is retained pursuant to section 8-202, subsection H, the court shall order continued probation supervision and treatment services until a child who has been adjudicated a delinquent juvenile reaches nineteen years of age or until otherwise terminated by the court. The court may terminate continued probation supervision or treatment services before the child's nineteenth birthday if the court determines that continued probation supervision or treatment is not required or is not in the best interests of the juvenile or the state or the juvenile commits a criminal offense after reaching eighteen years of age. Q. For the purposes of this section: 1. "First time felony juvenile offender" means a juvenile who is adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a felony offense if committed by an adult. 2. "Repeat felony juvenile offender" means a juvenile to whom both of the following apply: (a) Is adjudicated delinquent for an offense that would be a felony offense if committed by an adult. (b) Previously has been adjudicated a first time felony juvenile offender. 3. "Sexual offense" means oral sexual contact, sexual contact or sexual intercourse as defined in section 13-1401.END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 13-501, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-501. Persons under eighteen years of age; felony charging; definitions A. The county attorney shall bring a criminal prosecution against a juvenile in the same manner as an adult if the juvenile is fifteen, sixteen or seventeen years of age at the time the alleged offense is committed and the juvenile is accused of any of the following offenses: 1. First degree murder in violation of section 13-1105. 2. Second degree murder in violation of section 13-1104. 3. Forcible sexual assault in violation of section 13-1406. 4. Armed robbery in violation of section 13-1904. 5. Any other violent felony offense. 6. Any felony offense committed by a chronic felony offender. 7. Any offense that is properly joined to an offense listed in this subsection. B. Except as provided in subsection A of this section, the county attorney may bring a criminal prosecution against a juvenile who is charged with a felony offense in the same manner as an adult if the juvenile is at least fourteen years of age at the time the alleged offense is committed and the juvenile is accused of any of the following offenses only after a hearing is held in juvenile court in which the court finds probable cause exists to believe the offense was committed by the juvenile, and the court determines that public safety and the interests of justice require adult prosecution. The state has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that adult prosecution is necessary. In making this determination, the court shall consider the following factors: 1. A class 1 felony. 2. A class 2 felony. 3. A class 3 felony in violation of any offense in chapters 10 through 17 or chapter 19 or 23 of this title. 4. A class 3, 4, 5 or 6 felony involving a dangerous offense. 5. Any felony offense committed by a chronic felony offender. 6. Any offense that is properly joined to an offense listed in this subsection. 1. The seriousness and circumstances of the offense. 2. Whether the offense involved the use or threatened use of a deadly weapon. 3. The juvenile's prior delinquency history. 4. The juvenile's age, maturity and mental, emotional and psychological condition. 5. Whether the juvenile has previously participated in rehabilitation programs and the results of that participation. 6. Whether the juvenile has previously been committed to the department of juvenile corrections. 7. The views of the victim of the offense. 8. Whether the juvenile committed the offense while participating in, assisting, promoting or furthering the interests of a criminal street gang, a criminal syndicate or a racketeering enterprise. 9. Whether the degree of the juvenile's participation in the offense was relatively minor but not so minor as to constitute a defense to prosecution. 10. The likelihood of the juvenile's reasonable rehabilitation through available juvenile court services. C. A criminal prosecution shall be brought against a juvenile in the same manner as an adult if the juvenile has been accused of a criminal offense and has a historical prior felony conviction. D. At the time the county attorney files a complaint or indictment the county attorney shall file a written statement of specific facts supporting adult prosecution and a notice stating that the juvenile is a chronic felony offender. Subject to subsection E of this section, the notice shall establish and confer jurisdiction over the juvenile as a chronic felony offender. E. On motion of the juvenile the court shall hold a hearing after arraignment and before trial to determine if a juvenile is a chronic felony offender. The court shall issue written findings supporting its determination. At the hearing the state shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile is a chronic felony offender.  If the court does not find that the juvenile is a chronic felony offender, the court shall transfer the juvenile to the juvenile court pursuant to section 8-302. If the court finds that the juvenile is a chronic felony offender or if the juvenile does not file a motion to determine if the juvenile is a chronic felony offender, the criminal prosecution shall continue. F. Except as provided in section 13-921, a person who is charged pursuant to this section shall be sentenced in the criminal court in the same manner as an adult for any offense for which the person is convicted. G. Unless otherwise provided by law, nothing in this section shall be construed as to does not confer jurisdiction in the juvenile court over any person who is eighteen years of age or older. H. This section does not eliminate judicial discretion or due process protections that are guaranteed by the Arizona Constitution. H. I. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Accused" means a juvenile against whom a complaint, information or indictment is filed. 2. "Chronic felony offender" means: (a) A juvenile who has had two prior and separate adjudications and dispositions that were classified as any felony under chapter 14 of this title or a class 1, 2 or 3 felony for conduct that would constitute a historical prior felony conviction if the juvenile had been tried as an adult. (b) A juvenile who has been committed to the department of juvenile corrections and who has had two prior and separate felony adjudications and dispositions for conduct that would constitute a historical prior felony conviction if the juvenile had been tried as an adult. 3. "Forcible sexual assault" means sexual assault pursuant to section 13-1406 that is committed without consent as defined in section 13-1401, subsection a, paragraph 7, subdivision (a). 4. "Other violent felony offense" means: (a) Aggravated assault pursuant to section 13-1204, subsection A, paragraph 1. (b) Aggravated assault pursuant to section 13-1204, subsection A, paragraph 2 involving the use of a deadly weapon. (c) Drive by shooting pursuant to section 13-1209. (d) Discharging a firearm at a structure pursuant to section 13-1211. END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 13-610, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-610. DNA testing A. Within thirty days after a person is sentenced to the state department of corrections or a person who is accepted under the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers arrives in this state, the state department of corrections shall secure a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the person if the person was convicted of an offense listed in this section and was sentenced to a term of imprisonment or was convicted of any offense that was committed in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of any offense listed in this section and the person is under the supervision of the state department of corrections. The state department of corrections shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. B. Within thirty days after a person is placed on probation and sentenced to a term of incarceration in a county jail detention facility or is detained in a county juvenile detention facility, the county detention facility shall secure a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the person if the person was convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense listed in this section. The county detention facility shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. C. Within thirty days after a person is convicted and placed on probation without a term of incarceration or adjudicated delinquent and placed on probation, the county probation department shall secure a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the person if the person was convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense listed in this section. The county probation department shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. D. Within thirty days after the arrival of a person who is accepted under the interstate compact for the supervision of parolees and probationers and who is under the supervision of a county probation department, the county probation department shall secure a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the person if the person was convicted of an offense that was committed in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of any offense listed in this section and was sentenced to a term of probation. The county probation department shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. E. Within thirty days after a juvenile is committed to the department of juvenile corrections, the department of juvenile corrections shall secure a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the youth if the youth was adjudicated delinquent for an offense listed in this section and was committed to a secure care facility. The department of juvenile corrections shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. F. Within thirty days after the arrival in this state of a juvenile who is accepted by the department of juvenile corrections pursuant to the interstate compact on juveniles and who was adjudicated for an offense that was committed in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation of any offense listed in this section, the compact administrator shall request that the sending state impose as a condition of supervision that the juvenile submit a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing. If the sending state does not impose that condition, the department of juvenile corrections shall request a sufficient sample of blood or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing within thirty days after the juvenile's arrival in this state. The department of juvenile corrections shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. G. Notwithstanding subsections A through F, K, L and O of this section, the agency that is responsible for securing a sample pursuant to this section shall not secure the sample if the scientific criminal analysis section of the department of public safety has previously received and is maintaining a sample sufficient for deoxyribonucleic acid testing. H. The department of public safety shall do all of the following: 1. Conduct or oversee through mutual agreement an analysis of the samples that it receives pursuant to subsections K, L and O of this section. 2. Make and maintain a report of the results of each deoxyribonucleic acid analysis. 3. Maintain samples of blood and other bodily substances for at least thirty-five years. I. Any sample and the result of any test that is obtained pursuant to this section or section 8-238 may be used only as follows: 1. For law enforcement identification purposes. 2. In a proceeding in a criminal prosecution or juvenile adjudication. 3. In a proceeding under title 36, chapter 37. J. If the conviction or adjudication of a person who is subject to this section or section 8-238 is overturned on appeal or postconviction relief and a final mandate has been issued, on petition of the person to the superior court in the county in which the conviction occurred, the court shall order that the person's deoxyribonucleic acid profile resulting from that conviction or adjudication be expunged from the Arizona deoxyribonucleic acid identification system established by section 41-2418 unless the person has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent of another offense that would require the person to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid testing pursuant to this section. K. If a person is arrested for any offense listed in subsection O, paragraph 3 of this section and is transferred by the arresting authority to a state, county or local law enforcement agency or jail, the arresting authority or its designee shall secure a sufficient sample of buccal cells or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction from the person for the purpose of determining identification characteristics. The arresting authority or its designee shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. L. A person who is charged with a felony or misdemeanor offense listed in subsection O, paragraph 3 of this section and who is summoned to appear in court for an initial appearance shall report within five days of release on bail or on the person's own recognizance to the law enforcement agency that investigated the person or its designee and submit a sufficient sample of buccal cells or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction. The arresting authority or its designee shall transmit the sample to the department of public safety. M. A person who is subject to subsection K or L of this section or section 8-238 may petition the superior court in the county in which the arrest occurred or the criminal charge was filed to order that the person's deoxyribonucleic acid profile and sample be expunged from the Arizona deoxyribonucleic acid identification system, unless the person has been arrested, charged with or convicted of or adjudicated delinquent of for another offense that would require the person to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid testing pursuant to this section, if any of the following applies: 1. The criminal charges are not filed within the applicable period prescribed by section 13-107. 2. The criminal charges are dismissed. 3. The person is acquitted at trial. N. If any sample that is submitted to the department of public safety under this section or section 8-238 is found to be unacceptable for analysis and use or cannot be used by the department, the department shall require that another sample of blood or other bodily substances be secured pursuant to this section. O. This section applies to persons who are: 1. Convicted of any felony offense. 2. Adjudicated delinquent for any of the following offenses: (a) A violation or an attempt to violate any offense in chapter 11 of this title, any felony offense in chapter 14 or 35.1 of this title or section 13-1507, 13-1508 or 13-3608. (b) Any offense for which a person is required to register pursuant to section 13-3821. (c) A violation of any felony offense in chapter 34 of this title that may be prosecuted pursuant to section 13-501, subsection B, paragraph 2. (d) A violation of any felony offense that is listed in section 13-501, subsection A or any felony offense that may be prosecuted pursuant to section 13-501, subsection B. 3. Arrested for a violation of any offense in chapter 11 of this title, a violation of section 13-1402, 13-1403, 13-1404, 13-1405, 13-1406, 13-1410, 13-1411, 13-1417, 13-1507, 13-1508, 13-3208, 13-3214, 13-3555 or 13-3608 or a violation of any serious offense as defined in section 13-706 that is a dangerous offense.END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Section 13-1206, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1206. Dangerous or deadly assault by prisoner or juvenile; classification A person, while in the custody of the state department of corrections, the department of juvenile corrections, a law enforcement agency or a county or city jail, who commits an assault involving the discharge, use or threatening exhibition of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument or who intentionally or knowingly inflicts serious physical injury upon on another person is guilty of a class 2 felony. If the person is an adult or is a juvenile convicted as an adult pursuant to section 8-327 or 13-501 or the rules of procedure for the juvenile court, the person shall is not be eligible for suspension of sentence, probation, pardon or release from confinement on any basis until the sentence imposed by the court has been served or commuted. A sentence imposed pursuant to this section shall be consecutive to any other sentence presently being served by the convicted person.END_STATUTE Sec. 9.  Section 13-3967, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3967. Release on bailable offenses before trial; definition A. At his appearance before a judicial officer, any person who is charged with a public offense that is bailable as a matter of right shall be ordered released pending trial on his own recognizance or on the execution of bail in an amount specified by the judicial officer. B. In determining the method of release or the amount of bail, the judicial officer, on the basis of available information, shall take into account all of the following: 1. The views of the victim. 2. The nature and circumstances of the offense charged. 3. Whether the accused has a prior arrest or conviction for a serious offense or violent or aggravated felony as defined in section 13-706 or an offense in another state that would be a serious offense or violent or aggravated felony as defined in section 13-706 if committed in this state. 4. Evidence that the accused poses a danger to others in the community. 5. The results of a risk or lethality assessment in a domestic violence charge that is presented to the court. 6. The weight of evidence against the accused. 7. The accused's family ties, employment, financial resources, character and mental condition. 8. The results of any drug test submitted to the court. 9. Whether the accused is using any substance if its possession or use is illegal pursuant to chapter 34 of this title. 10. Whether the accused violated section 13-3407, subsection A, paragraph 2, 3, 4 or 7 involving methamphetamine or section 13-3407.01. 11. The length of residence in the community. 12. The accused's record of arrests and convictions. 13. The accused's record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution or failure to appear at court proceedings. 14. Whether the accused has entered or remained in the United States illegally. 15. Whether the accused's residence is in this state, in another state or outside the United States. C. If a judicial officer orders the release of a defendant who is charged with a felony either on his own recognizance or on bail, the judicial officer shall condition the defendant's release on the defendant's good behavior while so released. On a showing of probable cause that the defendant committed any offense during the period of release, a judicial officer may revoke the defendant's release pursuant to section 13-3968. D. After providing notice to the victim pursuant to section 13-4406, a judicial officer may impose any of the following conditions on a person who is released on his own recognizance or on bail: 1. Place the person in the custody of a designated person or organization agreeing to supervise him. 2. Place restrictions on the person's travel, associates or place of abode during the period of release. 3. Require the deposit with the clerk of the court of cash or other security, such deposit to be returned on the performance of the conditions of release. 4. Prohibit the person from possessing any deadly weapon or engaging in certain described activities or indulging in intoxicating liquors or certain drugs. 5. Require the person to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of an officer of the court. 6. Impose any other conditions deemed reasonably necessary to assure appearance as required including a condition requiring that the person return to custody after specified hours. E. In addition to any of the conditions a judicial officer may impose pursuant to subsection D of this section, the judicial officer shall impose both of the following conditions on a person who is charged with a felony violation of chapter 14 or 35.1 of this title or section 13-3212 and who is released on his own recognizance or on bail: 1. Electronic monitoring where available. 2. A condition prohibiting the person from having any contact with the victim. F. The judicial officer who authorizes the release of the person charged on his own recognizance or on bail shall do all of the following: 1. Issue an appropriate order containing statements of the conditions imposed. 2. Inform the person of the penalties that apply to any violation of the conditions of release. 3. Advise the person that a warrant for his arrest may be issued immediately on any violation of the conditions of release, including the failure to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid testing ordered pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. 4. If the person is charged with a felony or misdemeanor offense listed in section 13-610, subsection O, paragraph 3 and is summoned to appear, order the person to report within five days to the law enforcement agency that arrested the person or to the agency's designee and submit a sufficient sample of buccal cells or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction. If a person does not comply with an order issued pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall revoke the person's release. G. At any time after providing notice to the victim pursuant to section 13-4406, the judicial officer who orders the release of a person on any condition specified in this section or the court in which a prosecution is pending may amend the order to employ additional or different conditions of release, including either an increase or reduction in the amount of bail. On application, the defendant shall be entitled to have the conditions of release reviewed by the judicial officer who imposed them or by the court in which the prosecution is pending. Reasonable notice of the application shall be given to the county attorney and the victim. H. Any information that is stated or offered in connection with any order pursuant to this section need not conform to the rules pertaining to admissibility of evidence in a court of law. I. This section does not prevent the disposition of any case or class of cases by forfeiture of bail or collateral security if such disposition is authorized by the court. J. A judicial officer who orders the release of a juvenile who is enrolled in a school and who has been transferred to the criminal division of the superior court pursuant to section 8-327 13-501 or who has been charged as an adult pursuant to section 13-501 shall notify the appropriate school on the release of the juvenile from custody. K. For the purposes of this section and section 13-3968, "judicial officer" means any person or court authorized pursuant to the constitution or laws of this state to bail or otherwise release a person before trial or sentencing or pending appeal.END_STATUTE Sec. 10. Section 36-520, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-520. Application for evaluation; definition A. Any responsible individual may apply for a court-ordered evaluation of a person who is alleged to be, as a result of a mental disorder, a danger to self or to others or a person with a persistent or acute disability or a grave disability and who is unwilling or unable to undergo a voluntary evaluation. The application shall be made in the prescribed form and manner as adopted by the director. B. The application for evaluation shall include the following, if known: 1. The name and address of the proposed patient for whom evaluation is applied. 2. The age, date of birth, sex, race, marital status, occupation, social security number, present location, dates and places of previous hospitalizations, names and addresses of the guardian, agent under a health care power of attorney or mental health care power of attorney, spouse, next of kin and significant other persons and other data that the director may require on the form to whatever extent that this data is known and is applicable to the proposed patient. 3. The name, address and relationship of the person who is applying for the evaluation. 4. A statement that the proposed patient is exhibiting behaviors that may be consistent with a mental disorder and is believed to be, as a result of a mental disorder, a danger to self or to others or a patient with a persistent or acute disability or a grave disability and the facts on which this statement is based. 5. A statement from the applicant of whether the applicant believes that the proposed patient is or is not willing or able to undergo voluntary evaluation and the facts on which this statement is based. 6. A statement of the proposed patient's relevant history of mental health diagnosis, treatment recommended or provided and compliance with the treatment recommended or provided. 7. A statement that the applicant believes the proposed patient is in need of screening, evaluation, supervision, care and treatment and the facts on which this statement is based. 8. Copies of all documents relating to guardianship or powers of attorney that allow the guardian or agent to consent to inpatient psychiatric treatment, which shall be attached to the application if available at the time of the application. 9. A statement by the applicant of whether the applicant believes that, without a period of inpatient observation, stabilization and assessment or emergency inpatient psychiatric hospitalization, the proposed patient is likely to cause or endure serious physical harm or injury and the facts supporting that statement. 10. To the extent known, the names and contact information of persons other than the applicant who have witnessed the behavior exhibited by the proposed patient on which the application is based. The screening agency may not deny or refuse to process an application because no other witnesses have been identified. C. The application shall be signed and notarized. For an application made by a peace officer or a health care professional who is licensed pursuant to title 32, chapter 13, 15, 17 or 19.1, a copy of the application that contains the applicant's original signature is acceptable, does not have to be notarized and may be submitted as the written application. D. The screening agency shall offer assistance to the applicant in preparation of the application. On receipt of the application, the screening agency shall immediately note on the front of the application the time and date of receipt, shall log this information in a record of applications received by the screening agency and shall act as prescribed in section 36-521 within forty-eight hours after the filing of the application, excluding weekends and holidays. If the application is not acted on within forty-eight hours, excluding weekends and holidays, the reasons for not acting promptly shall be reviewed by the director of the screening agency or the director's designee and the reasons shall be stated in the report required by section 36-521, subsection B. E. If the applicant for the court-ordered evaluation presents the person to be evaluated at the screening agency, the agency shall conduct a prepetition screening examination. Except in the case of an emergency evaluation, the person to be evaluated shall not be detained or forced to undergo prepetition screening against the person's will. F. In the course of conducting a prepetition screening, the screening agency shall accept and consider information relevant to the present behavior and past behavioral health history of the proposed patient from persons who have a significant relationship with the proposed patient, including family members and guardians. G. If the applicant for the court-ordered evaluation does not present the person to be evaluated at the screening agency, the agency shall conduct the prepetition screening at the home of the person to be evaluated or any other place the person to be evaluated is found. If prepetition screening is not possible, the screening agency shall proceed as prescribed in section 36-521, subsection B. H. If a person is being treated by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner of that church or denomination, the person may not be ordered evaluated, detained or involuntarily treated unless the court has determined that the person is, as a result of mental disorder, a danger to others or to self. I. If the application is not acted on because it has been determined that the proposed patient does not need an evaluation, the medical director of the screening agency or the medical director's designee shall make a written statement of the reasons why the proposed patient does not need an evaluation and shall retain the application together with the medical director's statement and any records or reports concerning prepetition screening required pursuant to section 36-521. J. If the screening agency determines that the application should be denied or if the application is accepted but the screening agency declines to file a petition for court-ordered evaluation, the screening agency shall comply with the requirements of section 36-521, subsection C. If the screening of the proposed patient took place in a facility operated by the screening agency, the screening agency shall attempt to notify the applicant that the screening agency intends to release the proposed patient. The screening agency shall document the time and method of the notification or an unsuccessful attempt to notify the applicant. If requested by the applicant, the medical director of the screening agency or the medical director's designee shall provide the reason for the denial of the application or the decision not to file a petition for court-ordered evaluation if either: 1. The disclosure is not opposed by the person who was screened. 2. The person who was screened is deemed to lack capacity to make the decision to allow the disclosure and the disclosure is deemed to be in the person's best interest. K. For the purposes of this section, "person" includes a person who: 1. Is under eighteen years of age. 2. Has been transferred to the criminal division of the superior court pursuant to section 8-327 13-501 or who has been charged with an offense pursuant to section 13-501. 3. Is under the supervision of an adult probation department.END_STATUTE